Illinois, session 104th, HB2858.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.2 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.2)7    Sec. 5-5.2. Payment. 8    (a) All nursing facilities that are grouped pursuant to 9Section 5-5.1 of this Act shall receive the same rate of 10payment for similar services.11    (b) It shall be a matter of State policy that the Illinois 12Department shall utilize a uniform billing cycle throughout 13the State for the long-term care providers.14    (c) (Blank). 15    (c-1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code, 16the methodologies for reimbursement of nursing services as 17provided under this Article shall no longer be applicable for 18bills payable for nursing services rendered on or after a new 19reimbursement system based on the Patient Driven Payment Model 20(PDPM) has been fully operationalized, which shall take effect 21for services provided on or after the implementation of the 22PDPM reimbursement system begins. For the purposes of Public 23Act 102-1035, the implementation date of the PDPM   HB2858- 2 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1reimbursement system and all related provisions shall be July 21, 2022 if the following conditions are met: (i) the Centers 3for Medicare and Medicaid Services has approved corresponding 4changes in the reimbursement system and bed assessment; and 5(ii) the Department has filed rules to implement these changes 6no later than June 1, 2022. Failure of the Department to file 7rules to implement the changes provided in Public Act 102-1035 8no later than June 1, 2022 shall result in the implementation 9date being delayed to October 1, 2022. 10    (d) The new nursing services reimbursement methodology 11utilizing the Patient Driven Payment Model, which shall be 12referred to as the PDPM reimbursement system, taking effect 13July 1, 2022, upon federal approval by the Centers for 14Medicare and Medicaid Services, shall be based on the 15following: 16        (1) The methodology shall be resident-centered, 17    facility-specific, cost-based, and based on guidance from 18    the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. 19        (2) Costs shall be annually rebased and case mix index 20    quarterly updated. The nursing services methodology will 21    be assigned to the Medicaid enrolled residents on record 22    as of 30 days prior to the beginning of the rate period in 23    the Department's Medicaid Management Information System 24    (MMIS) as present on the last day of the second quarter 25    preceding the rate period based upon the Assessment 26    Reference Date of the Minimum Data Set (MDS).   HB2858- 3 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1        (3) Regional wage adjustors based on the Health 2    Service Areas (HSA) groupings and adjusters in effect on 3    April 30, 2012 shall be included, except no adjuster shall 4    be lower than 1.06. 5        (4) PDPM nursing case mix indices in effect on March 6    1, 2022 shall be assigned to each resident class at no less 7    than 0.7858 of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 8    Services PDPM unadjusted case mix values, in effect on 9    March 1, 2022.10        (5) The pool of funds available for distribution by 11    case mix and the base facility rate shall be determined 12    using the formula contained in subsection (d-1). 13        (6) The Department shall establish a variable per diem 14    staffing add-on in accordance with the most recent 15    available federal staffing report, currently the Payroll 16    Based Journal, for the same period of time, and if 17    applicable adjusted for acuity using the same quarter's 18    MDS. The Department shall rely on Payroll Based Journals 19    provided to the Department of Public Health to make a 20    determination of non-submission. If the Department is 21    notified by a facility of missing or inaccurate Payroll 22    Based Journal data or an incorrect calculation of 23    staffing, the Department must make a correction as soon as 24    the error is verified for the applicable quarter.25        Beginning October 1, 2024, the staffing percentage 26    used in the calculation of the per diem staffing add-on   HB2858- 4 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1    shall be its PDPM STRIVE Staffing Ratio which equals: its 2    Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day 3    as published in the most recent federal staffing report 4    (the Provider Information File), divided by the facility's 5    PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target. Each facility's PDPM STRIVE 6    Staffing Target is equal to .82 times the facility's 7    Illinois Adjusted Facility Case-Mix Hours Per Resident Per 8    Day. A facility's Illinois Adjusted Facility Case Mix 9    Hours Per Resident Per Day is equal to its Case-Mix Total 10    Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 11    the most recent federal staffing report) times 3.662 12    (which reflects the national resident days-weighted mean 13    Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day 14    as calculated using the January 2024 federal Provider 15    Information Files), divided by the national resident 16    days-weighted mean Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per 17    Resident Per Day calculated using the most recent federal 18    Provider Information File.19        (6.5) Beginning July 1, 2024, the paid per diem 20    staffing add-on shall be the paid per diem staffing add-on 21    in effect April 1, 2024. For dates beginning October 1, 22    2024 and through September 30, 2025, the denominator for 23    the staffing percentage shall be the lesser of the 24    facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target and:25            (A) For the quarter beginning October 1, 2024, the 26        sum of 20% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing   HB2858- 5 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1        Target and 80% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 2        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 3        the January 2024 federal staffing report).4            (B) For the quarter beginning January 1, 2025, the 5        sum of 40% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 6        Target and 60% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 7        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 8        the January 2024 federal staffing report).9            (C) For the quarter beginning March 1, 2025, the 10        sum of 60% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 11        Target and 40% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 12        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 13        the January 2024 federal staffing report).14            (D) For the quarter beginning July 1, 2025, the 15        sum of 80% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 16        Target and 20% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 17        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 18        the January 2024 federal staffing report). 19         Facilities with at least 70% of the staffing 20    indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a per diem 21    add-on of $9, increasing by equivalent steps for each 22    whole percentage point until the facilities reach a per 23    diem of $16.52. Facilities with at least 80% of the 24    staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a per 25    diem add-on of $16.52, increasing by equivalent steps for 26    each whole percentage point until the facilities reach a   HB2858- 6 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1    per diem add-on of $25.77. Facilities with at least 92% of 2    the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a 3    per diem add-on of $25.77, increasing by equivalent steps 4    for each whole percentage point until the facilities reach 5    a per diem add-on of $30.98. Facilities with at least 100% 6    of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be 7    paid a per diem add-on of $30.98, increasing by equivalent 8    steps for each whole percentage point until the facilities 9    reach a per diem add-on of $36.44. Facilities with at 10    least 110% of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study 11    shall be paid a per diem add-on of $36.44, increasing by 12    equivalent steps for each whole percentage point until the 13    facilities reach a per diem add-on of $38.68. Facilities 14    with at least 125% or higher of the staffing indicated by 15    the STRIVE study shall be paid a per diem add-on of $38.68. 16    No nursing facility's variable staffing per diem add-on 17    shall be reduced by more than 5% in 2 consecutive 18    quarters. For the quarters beginning July 1, 2022 and 19    October 1, 2022, no facility's variable per diem staffing 20    add-on shall be calculated at a rate lower than 85% of the 21    staffing indicated by the STRIVE study. No facility below 22    70% of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall 23    receive a variable per diem staffing add-on after December 24    31, 2022. 25        (7) For dates of services beginning July 1, 2022, the 26    PDPM nursing component per diem for each nursing facility   HB2858- 7 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1    shall be the product of the facility's (i) statewide PDPM 2    nursing base per diem rate, $92.25, adjusted for the 3    facility average PDPM case mix index calculated quarterly 4    and (ii) the regional wage adjuster, and then add the 5    Medicaid access adjustment as defined in (e-3) of this 6    Section. Transition rates for services provided between 7    July 1, 2022 and October 1, 2023 shall be the greater of 8    the PDPM nursing component per diem or: 9            (A) for the quarter beginning July 1, 2022, the 10        RUG-IV nursing component per diem;11            (B) for the quarter beginning October 1, 2022, the 12        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 13        multiplied by 0.80 and the PDPM nursing component per 14        diem multiplied by 0.20;15            (C) for the quarter beginning January 1, 2023, the 16        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 17        multiplied by 0.60 and the PDPM nursing component per 18        diem multiplied by 0.40;19            (D) for the quarter beginning April 1, 2023, the 20        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 21        multiplied by 0.40 and the PDPM nursing component per 22        diem multiplied by 0.60;23            (E) for the quarter beginning July 1, 2023, the 24        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 25        multiplied by 0.20 and the PDPM nursing component per 26        diem multiplied by 0.80; or  HB2858- 8 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1            (F) for the quarter beginning October 1, 2023 and 2        each subsequent quarter, the transition rate shall end 3        and a nursing facility shall be paid 100% of the PDPM 4        nursing component per diem.5    (d-1) Calculation of base year Statewide RUG-IV nursing 6base per diem rate. 7        (1) Base rate spending pool shall be: 8            (A) The base year resident days which are 9        calculated by multiplying the number of Medicaid 10        residents in each nursing home as indicated in the MDS 11        data defined in paragraph (4) by 365.12            (B) Each facility's nursing component per diem in 13        effect on July 1, 2012 shall be multiplied by 14        subsection (A).15            (C) Thirteen million is added to the product of 16        subparagraph (A) and subparagraph (B) to adjust for 17        the exclusion of nursing homes defined in paragraph 18        (5). 19        (2) For each nursing home with Medicaid residents as 20    indicated by the MDS data defined in paragraph (4), 21    weighted days adjusted for case mix and regional wage 22    adjustment shall be calculated. For each home this 23    calculation is the product of:24            (A) Base year resident days as calculated in 25        subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).26            (B) The nursing home's regional wage adjustor   HB2858- 9 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1        based on the Health Service Areas (HSA) groupings and 2        adjustors in effect on April 30, 2012.3            (C) Facility weighted case mix which is the number 4        of Medicaid residents as indicated by the MDS data 5        defined in paragraph (4) multiplied by the associated 6        case weight for the RUG-IV 48 grouper model using 7        standard RUG-IV procedures for index maximization.8            (D) The sum of the products calculated for each 9        nursing home in subparagraphs (A) through (C) above 10        shall be the base year case mix, rate adjusted 11        weighted days.12        (3) The Statewide RUG-IV nursing base per diem rate:13            (A) on January 1, 2014 shall be the quotient of the 14        paragraph (1) divided by the sum calculated under 15        subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2);16            (B) on and after July 1, 2014 and until July 1, 17        2022, shall be the amount calculated under 18        subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (3) plus $1.76; and 19            (C) beginning July 1, 2022 and thereafter, $7 20        shall be added to the amount calculated under 21        subparagraph (B) of this paragraph (3) of this 22        Section. 23        (4) Minimum Data Set (MDS) comprehensive assessments 24    for Medicaid residents on the last day of the quarter used 25    to establish the base rate.26        (5) Nursing facilities designated as of July 1, 2012   HB2858- 10 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1    by the Department as "Institutions for Mental Disease" 2    shall be excluded from all calculations under this 3    subsection. The data from these facilities shall not be 4    used in the computations described in paragraphs (1) 5    through (4) above to establish the base rate. 6    (e) Beginning July 1, 2014, the Department shall allocate 7funding in the amount up to $10,000,000 for per diem add-ons to 8the RUGS methodology for dates of service on and after July 1, 92014:10        (1) $0.63 for each resident who scores in I4200 11    Alzheimer's Disease or I4800 non-Alzheimer's Dementia.12        (2) $2.67 for each resident who scores either a "1" or 13    "2" in any items S1200A through S1200I and also scores in 14    RUG groups PA1, PA2, BA1, or BA2.15    (e-1) (Blank).16    (e-2) For dates of services beginning January 1, 2014 and 17ending September 30, 2023, the RUG-IV nursing component per 18diem for a nursing home shall be the product of the statewide 19RUG-IV nursing base per diem rate, the facility average case 20mix index, and the regional wage adjustor. For dates of 21service beginning July 1, 2022 and ending September 30, 2023, 22the Medicaid access adjustment described in subsection (e-3) 23shall be added to the product. 24    (e-3) A Medicaid Access Adjustment of $4 adjusted for the 25facility average PDPM case mix index calculated quarterly 26shall be added to the statewide PDPM nursing per diem for all   HB2858- 11 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1facilities with annual Medicaid bed days of at least 70% of all 2occupied bed days adjusted quarterly. For each new calendar 3year and for the 6-month period beginning July 1, 2022, the 4percentage of a facility's occupied bed days comprised of 5Medicaid bed days shall be determined by the Department 6quarterly. For dates of service beginning January 1, 2023, the 7Medicaid Access Adjustment shall be increased to $4.75. This 8subsection shall be inoperative on and after January 1, 2028. 9    (e-4) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 102024, the Department shall increase the rate add-on at 11paragraph (7) subsection (a) under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 147.335 12for ventilator services from $208 per day to $481 per day. 13Payment is subject to the criteria and requirements under 89 14Ill. Adm. Code 147.335. 15    (f) (Blank).16    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, on 17and after July 1, 2012, for facilities not designated by the 18Department of Healthcare and Family Services as "Institutions 19for Mental Disease", rates effective May 1, 2011 shall be 20adjusted as follows:21        (1) (Blank);22        (2) (Blank);23        (3) Facility rates for the capital and support 24    components shall be reduced by 1.7%.25    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, on 26and after July 1, 2012, nursing facilities designated by the   HB2858- 12 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1Department of Healthcare and Family Services as "Institutions 2for Mental Disease" and "Institutions for Mental Disease" that 3are facilities licensed under the Specialized Mental Health 4Rehabilitation Act of 2013 shall have the nursing, 5socio-developmental, capital, and support components of their 6reimbursement rate effective May 1, 2011 reduced in total by 72.7%.8    (i) On and after July 1, 2014, the reimbursement rates for 9the support component of the nursing facility rate for 10facilities licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled 11or intermediate care facilities shall be the rate in effect on 12June 30, 2014 increased by 8.17%. 13    (i-1) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 142024, the reimbursement rates for the support component of the 15nursing facility rate for facilities licensed under the 16Nursing Home Care Act as skilled or intermediate care 17facilities shall be the rate in effect on June 30, 2023 18increased by 12%. 19    (i-2) Subject to federal approval, beginning on January 1, 202026, the reimbursement rates for the support component of the 21nursing facility rate for facilities licensed under the 22Nursing Home Care Act as skilled or intermediate care 23facilities and for facilities licensed under the Specialized 24Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013 shall be the rate in 25effect on June 30, 2024 increased by the percent change in the 26Consumer Price Index-U from September 2016 to September 2025.   HB2858- 13 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1As used in this subsection, "Consumer Price Index-U" means the 2index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 3United States Department of Labor that measures the average 4change in prices of goods and services purchased by all urban 5consumers, United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 6100. 7    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject to 8federal approval, effective July 1, 2019, sufficient funds 9shall be allocated for changes to rates for facilities 10licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing 11facilities or intermediate care facilities for dates of 12services on and after July 1, 2019: (i) to establish, through 13June 30, 2022 a per diem add-on to the direct care per diem 14rate not to exceed $70,000,000 annually in the aggregate 15taking into account federal matching funds for the purpose of 16addressing the facility's unique staffing needs, adjusted 17quarterly and distributed by a weighted formula based on 18Medicaid bed days on the last day of the second quarter 19preceding the quarter for which the rate is being adjusted. 20Beginning July 1, 2022, the annual $70,000,000 described in 21the preceding sentence shall be dedicated to the variable per 22diem add-on for staffing under paragraph (6) of subsection 23(d); and (ii) in an amount not to exceed $170,000,000 annually 24in the aggregate taking into account federal matching funds to 25permit the support component of the nursing facility rate to 26be updated as follows:  HB2858- 14 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1        (1) 80%, or $136,000,000, of the funds shall be used 2    to update each facility's rate in effect on June 30, 2019 3    using the most recent cost reports on file, which have had 4    a limited review conducted by the Department of Healthcare 5    and Family Services and will not hold up enacting the rate 6    increase, with the Department of Healthcare and Family 7    Services. 8        (2) After completing the calculation in paragraph (1), 9    any facility whose rate is less than the rate in effect on 10    June 30, 2019 shall have its rate restored to the rate in 11    effect on June 30, 2019 from the 20% of the funds set 12    aside. 13        (3) The remainder of the 20%, or $34,000,000, shall be 14    used to increase each facility's rate by an equal 15    percentage. 16    (k) During the first quarter of State Fiscal Year 2020, 17the Department of Healthcare of Family Services must convene a 18technical advisory group consisting of members of all trade 19associations representing Illinois skilled nursing providers 20to discuss changes necessary with federal implementation of 21Medicare's Patient-Driven Payment Model. Implementation of 22Medicare's Patient-Driven Payment Model shall, by September 1, 232020, end the collection of the MDS data that is necessary to 24maintain the current RUG-IV Medicaid payment methodology. The 25technical advisory group must consider a revised reimbursement 26methodology that takes into account transparency,   HB2858- 15 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1accountability, actual staffing as reported under the 2federally required Payroll Based Journal system, changes to 3the minimum wage, adequacy in coverage of the cost of care, and 4a quality component that rewards quality improvements.5    (l) The Department shall establish per diem add-on 6payments to improve the quality of care delivered by 7facilities, including:8        (1) Incentive payments determined by facility 9    performance on specified quality measures in an initial 10    amount of $70,000,000. Nothing in this subsection shall be 11    construed to limit the quality of care payments in the 12    aggregate statewide to $70,000,000, and, if quality of 13    care has improved across nursing facilities, the 14    Department shall adjust those add-on payments accordingly. 15    The quality payment methodology described in this 16    subsection must be used for at least State Fiscal Year 17    2023. Beginning with the quarter starting July 1, 2023, 18    the Department may add, remove, or change quality metrics 19    and make associated changes to the quality payment 20    methodology as outlined in subparagraph (E). Facilities 21    designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 22    Services as a special focus facility or a hospital-based 23    nursing home do not qualify for quality payments.24            (A) Each quality pool must be distributed by 25        assigning a quality weighted score for each nursing 26        home which is calculated by multiplying the nursing   HB2858- 16 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1        home's quality base period Medicaid days by the 2        nursing home's star rating weight in that period.3            (B) Star rating weights are assigned based on the 4        nursing home's star rating for the LTS quality star 5        rating. As used in this subparagraph, "LTS quality 6        star rating" means the long-term stay quality rating 7        for each nursing facility, as assigned by the Centers 8        for Medicare and Medicaid Services under the Five-Star 9        Quality Rating System. The rating is a number ranging 10        from 0 (lowest) to 5 (highest).11                (i) Zero-star or one-star rating has a weight 12            of 0.13                (ii) Two-star rating has a weight of 0.75.14                (iii) Three-star rating has a weight of 1.5. 15                (iv) Four-star rating has a weight of 2.5.16                (v) Five-star rating has a weight of 3.5.17            (C) Each nursing home's quality weight score is 18        divided by the sum of all quality weight scores for 19        qualifying nursing homes to determine the proportion 20        of the quality pool to be paid to the nursing home. 21            (D) The quality pool is no less than $70,000,000 22        annually or $17,500,000 per quarter. The Department 23        shall publish on its website the estimated payments 24        and the associated weights for each facility 45 days 25        prior to when the initial payments for the quarter are 26        to be paid. The Department shall assign each facility   HB2858- 17 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1        the most recent and applicable quarter's STAR value 2        unless the facility notifies the Department within 15 3        days of an issue and the facility provides reasonable 4        evidence demonstrating its timely compliance with 5        federal data submission requirements for the quarter 6        of record. If such evidence cannot be provided to the 7        Department, the STAR rating assigned to the facility 8        shall be reduced by one from the prior quarter. 9            (E) The Department shall review quality metrics 10        used for payment of the quality pool and make 11        recommendations for any associated changes to the 12        methodology for distributing quality pool payments in 13        consultation with associations representing long-term 14        care providers, consumer advocates, organizations 15        representing workers of long-term care facilities, and 16        payors. The Department may establish, by rule, changes 17        to the methodology for distributing quality pool 18        payments. 19            (F) The Department shall disburse quality pool 20        payments from the Long-Term Care Provider Fund on a 21        monthly basis in amounts proportional to the total 22        quality pool payment determined for the quarter. 23            (G) The Department shall publish any changes in 24        the methodology for distributing quality pool payments 25        prior to the beginning of the measurement period or 26        quality base period for any metric added to the   HB2858- 18 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1        distribution's methodology. 2        (2) Payments based on CNA tenure, promotion, and CNA 3    training for the purpose of increasing CNA compensation. 4    It is the intent of this subsection that payments made in 5    accordance with this paragraph be directly incorporated 6    into increased compensation for CNAs. As used in this 7    paragraph, "CNA" means a certified nursing assistant as 8    that term is described in Section 3-206 of the Nursing 9    Home Care Act, Section 3-206 of the ID/DD Community Care 10    Act, and Section 3-206 of the MC/DD Act. The Department 11    shall establish, by rule, payments to nursing facilities 12    equal to Medicaid's share of the tenure wage increments 13    specified in this paragraph for all reported CNA employee 14    hours compensated according to a posted schedule 15    consisting of increments at least as large as those 16    specified in this paragraph. The increments are as 17    follows: an additional $1.50 per hour for CNAs with at 18    least one and less than 2 years' experience plus another 19    $1 per hour for each additional year of experience up to a 20    maximum of $6.50 for CNAs with at least 6 years of 21    experience. For purposes of this paragraph, Medicaid's 22    share shall be the ratio determined by paid Medicaid bed 23    days divided by total bed days for the applicable time 24    period used in the calculation. In addition, and additive 25    to any tenure increments paid as specified in this 26    paragraph, the Department shall establish, by rule,   HB2858- 19 -LRB104 10495 KTG 20570 b1    payments supporting Medicaid's share of the 2    promotion-based wage increments for CNA employee hours 3    compensated for that promotion with at least a $1.50 4    hourly increase. Medicaid's share shall be established as 5    it is for the tenure increments described in this 6    paragraph. Qualifying promotions shall be defined by the 7    Department in rules for an expected 10-15% subset of CNAs 8    assigned intermediate, specialized, or added roles such as 9    CNA trainers, CNA scheduling "captains", and CNA 10    specialists for resident conditions like dementia or 11    memory care or behavioral health.12    (m) The Department shall work with nursing facility 13industry representatives to design policies and procedures to 14permit facilities to address the integrity of data from 15federal reporting sites used by the Department in setting 16facility rates. 17(Source: P.A. 102-77, eff. 7-9-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 18102-1035, eff. 5-31-22; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23; 103-102, 19Article 40, Section 40-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, Article 50, 20Section 50-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 217-1-24.) 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.